District of Columbia statutes.
4-1321.05

Privileges; waiver.

Notwithstanding the provisions of §§ 14-306 and 14-307, neither the spouse or domestic partner privilege nor the physician-patient privilege shall be grounds for excluding evidence in any proceeding in the Family Division of the Superior Court of the District of Columbia concerning the welfare of a neglected child; provided, that a judge of the Family Division of the Superior Court of the District of Columbia determines such privilege should be waived in the interest of justice.

Nov. 6, 1966, 80 Stat. 1355, Pub. L. 89-775, § 5
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 577, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 159(a)
Sept. 23, 1977, D.C. Law 2-22, title I, § 103(f), 24 DCR 3341
Sept. 12, 2008, D.C. Law 17-231, § 13, 55 DCR 6758

History

1981 Ed., § 2-1355.
1973 Ed., § 2-165.

Prior Codifications

D.C. Law 17-231 substituted “spouse or domestic partner” for “husband-wife”.

Effect of Amendments